hr-HR: Tehnologija detekcije: Antitijelo; Antigen; Kombinacija antigen/antitijelo; ELISA; Lateralni protočni imunotest; PCR; RNA NAT; Brzi dijagnostički test; Western blot; Ostalo
el: Τεχνολογία ανίχνευσης: Αντίσωμα; Αντιγόνο; Συνδυασμός αντιγόνου/αντισώματος; ELISA; Ανοσοδοκιμασία πλευρικής ροής; PCR; RNA NAT; Ταχεία διαγνωστική δοκιμή; Western blot; Άλλο
pt-PT: Tecnologia de deteção: Anticorpo; Antigénio; Combinação antigénio/anticorpo; ELISA; Imunoensaio de fluxo lateral; PCR; NAT de RNA; Teste de diagnóstico rápido; Western blot; Outro
nl: Detectietechnologie: Antilichaam; Antigeen; Antigeen/antilichaam combo; ELISA; Laterale flow immunoassay; PCR; RNA NAT; Snelle diagnostische test; Western blot; Andere
cs: Detekční technologie: Protilátka; Antigen; Kombinace antigen/protilátka; ELISA; Imunochromatografická analýza; PCR; RNA NAT; Rychlý diagnostický test; Western blot; Jiné
bg-BG: Технология за откриване: Антитяло; Антиген; Комбинация антиген/антитяло; ELISA; Латерален поточен имуноанализ; PCR; RNA NAT; Бърз диагностичен тест; Western blot; Други
en: Detection technology: Antibody; Antigen; Antigen/antibody combo; ELISA; Lateral flow immunoassay; PCR; RNA NAT; Rapid diagnostic test; Western blot; Other
es: Tecnología de detección: Anticuerpo; Antígeno; Combo de antígeno/anticuerpo; ELISA; Inmunoensayo de flujo lateral; PCR; NAT de ARN; Prueba diagnóstica rápida; Western blot; Otros
de: Nachweistechnologie: Antikörper; Antigen; Antigen/Antikörper-Kombi; ELISA; Lateral-Flow-Immunassay; PCR; RNA NAT; Schnelldiagnosetest; Western Blot; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Detekčná technológia: Protilátka; Antigén; Kombinácia antigén/protilátka; ELISA; Laterálny prietokový imunotest; PCR; RNA NAT; Rýchly diagnostický test; Western blot; Iné
nb: Påvisningsteknologi: Antistoff; Antigen; Antigen/antistoff-kombinasjon; ELISA; Lateral flow-immunoassay; PCR; RNA NAT; Hurtigdiagnosetest; Western blot; Annet
zh-CN: 检测技术: 抗体; 抗原; 抗原/抗体组合; elisa; 侧流免疫测定; pcr; RNA 核酸检测; 快速诊断测试; 蛋白质印迹; 其他
vi: Công nghệ phát hiện: Kháng thể; Kháng nguyên; Kháng nguyên/kháng thể kết hợp; ELISA; Xét nghiệm miễn dịch dòng chảy bên; PCR; RNA NAT; Xét nghiệm chẩn đoán nhanh; Western blot; Khác
zh-TW: 檢測技術: 抗體; 抗原; 抗原/抗體組合; ELISA; 側流免疫檢測; PCR; RNA NAT; 快速診斷檢測; 西方墨點法; 其他
sl-SI: Tehnologija zaznavanja: Protitelesa; Antigen; Kombinacija antigena/protiteles; ELISA; Stranski pretočni imunski test; PCR; RNA NAT; Hitri diagnostični test; Western blot; Drugo
da: Detektionsteknologi: Antistof; Antigen; Antigen/antistof kombination; ELISA; Lateral flow immunoassay; PCR; RNA NAT; Hurtig diagnostisk test; Western blot; Andet
pl: Technologia wykrywania: Przeciwciało; Antygen; Kombinacja antygen/przeciwciało; ELISA; Immunotest przepływu bocznego; PCR; Test RNA NAT; Szybki test diagnostyczny; Western blot; Inne
lt-LT: Aptikimo technologija: Antikūnai; Antigenas; Antigeno/antikūnų derinys; ELISA; Šoninio srauto imunotestas; PGR; RNR NAT; Greitas diagnostikos testas; Vesternblotas; Kita
it: Tecnologia di rilevamento: Anticorpo; Antigene; Combinazione antigene/anticorpo; ELISA; Test immunocromatografico; PCR; RNA NAT; Test diagnostico rapido; Western blot; Altro
ja: 検出技術: 抗体; 抗原; 抗原/抗体コンボ; ELISA; ラテラルフロー免疫測定法; PCR; RNA NAT; 迅速診断検査; ウェスタンブロット; その他
ko: 검출 기술: 항체; 항원; 항원/항체 복합; ELISA; 측방 유동 면역 분석; PCR; RNA NAT; 신속 진단 검사; 웨스턴 블롯; 기타
fr: Technologie de détection: Anticorps; Antigène; Combo antigène/anticorps; ELISA; Test immunochromatographique; PCR; ARN NAT; Test de diagnostic rapide; Western blot; Autre
ro-RO: Tehnologie de detectare: Anticorp; Antigen; Combinație antigen/anticorp; ELISA; Test imunocromatografic; PCR; Test ARN NAT; Test de diagnostic rapid; Western blot; Altele
th: เทคโนโลยีการตรวจจับ: แอนติบอดี; แอนติเจน; แอนติเจน/แอนติบอดีร่วมกัน; ELISA; ชุดตรวจอิมมูโนโครมาโตกราฟี; PCR; RNA NAT; ชุดตรวจเร็ว; เวสเทิร์นบลอต; อื่นๆ
hu: Kimutatási technológia: Antitest; Antigén; Antigén/antitest kombináció; ELISA; Laterális áramlási immunvizsgálat; PCR; RNS NAT; Gyors diagnosztikai teszt; Western blot; Egyéb
pt-BR: Tecnologia de detecção: Anticorpo; Antígeno; Combo antígeno/anticorpo; ELISA; Imunoensaio de fluxo lateral; PCR; NAT de RNA; Teste diagnóstico rápido; Western blot; Outro
tr: Tespit teknolojisi: Antikor; Antijen; Antijen/antikor kombinasyonu; ELISA; Lateral akış immüno test; PCR; RNA NAT; Hızlı tanı testi; Western blot; Diğer
fi: Tunnistusteknologia: Vasta-aine; Antigeeni; Antigeeni/vasta-aine -yhdistelmä; ELISA; Lateraalivirtausimmunotesti; PCR; RNA NAT; Pikatesti; Western blot; Muu
sv: Detektionsteknik: Antikropp; Antigen; Antigen/antikropp-kombination; ELISA; Lateral flow-immunanalys; PCR; RNA NAT; Snabbdiagnostiskt test; Western blot; Övrigt
ru: Технология обнаружения: Антитело; Антиген; Комбинация антиген/антитело; ИФА; Иммунохроматография; ПЦР; РНК НАТ; Экспресс-тест; Вестерн-блот; Другой